Illinois, session 104th, HB4280.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 514-8.02 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/14-8.02)7    Sec. 14-8.02. Identification, evaluation, and placement of 8children. 9    (a) The State Board of Education shall make rules under 10which local school boards shall determine the eligibility of 11children to receive special education. Such rules shall ensure 12that a free appropriate public education be available to all 13children with disabilities as defined in Section 14-1.02. The 14State Board of Education shall require local school districts 15to administer non-discriminatory procedures or tests to 16English learners coming from homes in which a language other 17than English is used to determine their eligibility to receive 18special education. The placement of low English proficiency 19students in special education programs and facilities shall be 20made in accordance with the test results reflecting the 21student's linguistic, cultural and special education needs. 22For purposes of determining the eligibility of children the 23State Board of Education shall include in the rules   HB4280- 2 -LRB104 16661 LNS 30065 b1definitions of "case study", "staff conference", 2"individualized educational program", and "qualified 3specialist" appropriate to each category of children with 4disabilities as defined in this Article. For purposes of 5determining the eligibility of children from homes in which a 6language other than English is used, the State Board of 7Education shall include in the rules definitions for 8"qualified bilingual specialists" and "linguistically and 9culturally appropriate individualized educational programs". 10For purposes of this Section, as well as Sections 14-8.02a, 1114-8.02b, and 14-8.02c of this Code, "parent" means a parent 12as defined in the federal Individuals with Disabilities 13Education Act (20 U.S.C. 1401(23)). 14    (b) No child shall be eligible for special education 15facilities except with a carefully completed case study fully 16reviewed by professional personnel in a multidisciplinary 17staff conference and only upon the recommendation of qualified 18specialists or a qualified bilingual specialist, if available. 19At the conclusion of the multidisciplinary staff conference, 20the parent of the child and, if the child is in the legal 21custody of the Department of Children and Family Services, the 22Department's Office of Education and Transition Services shall 23be given a copy of the multidisciplinary conference summary 24report and recommendations, which includes options considered, 25and, in the case of the parent, be informed of his or her right 26to obtain an independent educational evaluation if he or she   HB4280- 3 -LRB104 16661 LNS 30065 b1disagrees with the evaluation findings conducted or obtained 2by the school district. If the school district's evaluation is 3shown to be inappropriate, the school district shall reimburse 4the parent for the cost of the independent evaluation. The 5State Board of Education shall, with advice from the State 6Advisory Council on Education of Children with Disabilities on 7the inclusion of specific independent educational evaluators, 8prepare a list of suggested independent educational 9evaluators. The State Board of Education shall include on the 10list clinical psychologists licensed pursuant to the Clinical 11Psychologist Licensing Act. Such psychologists shall not be 12paid fees in excess of the amount that would be received by a 13school psychologist for performing the same services. The 14State Board of Education shall supply school districts with 15such list and make the list available to parents at their 16request. School districts shall make the list available to 17parents at the time they are informed of their right to obtain 18an independent educational evaluation. However, the school 19district may initiate an impartial due process hearing under 20this Section within 7 school days of any written parent 21request for an independent educational evaluation to show that 22its evaluation is appropriate. If the final decision is that 23the evaluation is appropriate, the parent still has a right to 24an independent educational evaluation, but not at public 25expense. An independent educational evaluation at public 26expense must be completed within 60 school days of a parent's   HB4280- 4 -LRB104 16661 LNS 30065 b1written request unless the school district initiates an 2impartial due process hearing or the parent or school district 3offers reasonable grounds to show that such time period should 4be extended. If the due process hearing decision indicates 5that the parent is entitled to an independent educational 6evaluation, it must be completed within 60 school days of the 7decision unless the parent or the school district offers 8reasonable grounds to show that such period should be 9extended. If a parent disagrees with the summary report or 10recommendations of the multidisciplinary conference or the 11findings of any educational evaluation which results 12therefrom, the school district shall not proceed with a 13placement based upon such evaluation and the child shall 14remain in his or her regular classroom setting. No child shall 15be eligible for admission to a special class for children with 16a mental disability who are educable or for children with a 17mental disability who are trainable except with a 18psychological evaluation and recommendation by a school 19psychologist. Consent shall be obtained from the parent of a 20child before any evaluation is conducted. If consent is not 21given by the parent or if the parent disagrees with the 22findings of the evaluation, then the school district may 23initiate an impartial due process hearing under this Section. 24The school district may evaluate the child if that is the 25decision resulting from the impartial due process hearing and 26the decision is not appealed or if the decision is affirmed on   HB4280- 5 -LRB104 16661 LNS 30065 b1appeal. The determination of eligibility shall be made and the 2IEP meeting shall be completed within 60 school days from the 3date of written parental consent. In those instances when 4written parental consent is obtained with fewer than 60 pupil 5attendance days left in the school year, the eligibility 6determination shall be made and the IEP meeting shall be 7completed prior to the first day of the following school year. 8Special education and related services must be provided in 9accordance with the student's IEP no later than 10 school 10attendance days after notice is provided to the parents 11pursuant to Section 300.503 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal 12Regulations and implementing rules adopted by the State Board 13of Education. The appropriate program pursuant to the 14individualized educational program of students whose native 15tongue is a language other than English shall reflect the 16special education, cultural and linguistic needs. No later 17than September 1, 1993, the State Board of Education shall 18establish standards for the development, implementation and 19monitoring of appropriate bilingual special individualized 20educational programs. The State Board of Education shall 21further incorporate appropriate monitoring procedures to 22verify implementation of these standards. The district shall 23indicate to the parent, the State Board of Education, and, if 24applicable, the Department's Office of Education and 25Transition Services the nature of the services the child will 26receive for the regular school term while awaiting placement   HB4280- 6 -LRB104 16661 LNS 30065 b1in the appropriate special education class. At the child's 2initial IEP meeting and at each annual review meeting, the 3child's IEP team shall provide the child's parent or guardian 4and, if applicable, the Department's Office of Education and 5Transition Services with a written notification that informs 6the parent or guardian or the Department's Office of Education 7and Transition Services that the IEP team is required to 8consider whether the child requires assistive technology in 9order to receive free, appropriate public education. The 10notification must also include a toll-free telephone number 11and internet address for the State's assistive technology 12program. 13    If the child is deaf, hard of hearing, blind, or visually 14impaired or has an orthopedic impairment or physical 15disability and he or she might be eligible to receive services 16from the Illinois School for the Deaf, the Illinois School for 17the Visually Impaired, the Illinois Center for Rehabilitation 18and Education-Wood, or the Illinois Center for Rehabilitation 19and Education-Roosevelt, the school district shall notify the 20parents, in writing, of the existence of these schools and the 21services they provide and shall make a reasonable effort to 22inform the parents of the existence of other, local schools 23that provide similar services and the services that these 24other schools provide. This notification shall include, 25without limitation, information on school services, school 26admissions criteria, and school contact information.  HB4280- 7 -LRB104 16661 LNS 30065 b1    In the development of the individualized education program 2for a student who has a disability on the autism spectrum 3(which includes autistic disorder, Asperger's disorder, 4pervasive developmental disorder not otherwise specified, 5childhood disintegrative disorder, and Rett Syndrome, as 6defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental 7Disorders, fourth edition (DSM-IV, 2000)), the IEP team shall 8consider all of the following factors:9        (1) The verbal and nonverbal communication needs of 10    the child.11        (2) The need to develop social interaction skills and 12    proficiencies.13        (3) The needs resulting from the child's unusual 14    responses to sensory experiences.15        (4) The needs resulting from resistance to 16    environmental change or change in daily routines.17        (5) The needs resulting from engagement in repetitive 18    activities and stereotyped movements.19        (6) The need for any positive behavioral 20    interventions, strategies, and supports to address any 21    behavioral difficulties resulting from autism spectrum 22    disorder.23        (7) Other needs resulting from the child's disability 24    that impact progress in the general curriculum, including 25    social and emotional development.26Public Act 95-257 does not create any new entitlement to a   HB4280- 8 -LRB104 16661 LNS 30065 b1service, program, or benefit, but must not affect any 2entitlement to a service, program, or benefit created by any 3other law. 4    If the student may be eligible to participate in the 5Home-Based Support Services Program for Adults with Mental 6Disabilities authorized under the Developmental Disability and 7Mental Disability Services Act upon becoming an adult, the 8student's individualized education program shall include plans 9for (i) determining the student's eligibility for those 10home-based services, (ii) enrolling the student in the program 11of home-based services, and (iii) developing a plan for the 12student's most effective use of the home-based services after 13the student becomes an adult and no longer receives special 14educational services under this Article. The plans developed 15under this paragraph shall include specific actions to be 16taken by specified individuals, agencies, or officials.17    (c) In the development of the individualized education 18program for a student who is functionally blind, it shall be 19presumed that proficiency in Braille reading and writing is 20essential for the student's satisfactory educational progress. 21For purposes of this subsection, the State Board of Education 22shall determine the criteria for a student to be classified as 23functionally blind. Students who are not currently identified 24as functionally blind who are also entitled to Braille 25instruction include: (i) those whose vision loss is so severe 26that they are unable to read and write at a level comparable to   HB4280- 9 -LRB104 16661 LNS 30065 b1their peers solely through the use of vision, and (ii) those 2who show evidence of progressive vision loss that may result 3in functional blindness. Each student who is functionally 4blind shall be entitled to Braille reading and writing 5instruction that is sufficient to enable the student to 6communicate with the same level of proficiency as other 7students of comparable ability. Instruction should be provided 8to the extent that the student is physically and cognitively 9able to use Braille. Braille instruction may be used in 10combination with other special education services appropriate 11to the student's educational needs. The assessment of each 12student who is functionally blind for the purpose of 13developing the student's individualized education program 14shall include documentation of the student's strengths and 15weaknesses in Braille skills. Each person assisting in the 16development of the individualized education program for a 17student who is functionally blind shall receive information 18describing the benefits of Braille instruction. The 19individualized education program for each student who is 20functionally blind shall specify the appropriate learning 21medium or media based on the assessment report.22    (d) To the maximum extent appropriate, the placement shall 23provide the child with the opportunity to be educated with 24children who do not have a disability; provided that children 25with disabilities who are recommended to be placed into 26regular education classrooms are provided with supplementary   HB4280- 10 -LRB104 16661 LNS 30065 b1services to assist the children with disabilities to benefit 2from the regular classroom instruction and are included on the 3teacher's regular education class register. Subject to the 4limitation of the preceding sentence, placement in special 5classes, separate schools or other removal of the child with a 6disability from the regular educational environment shall 7occur only when the nature of the severity of the disability is 8such that education in the regular classes with the use of 9supplementary aids and services cannot be achieved 10satisfactorily. The placement of English learners with 11disabilities shall be in non-restrictive environments which 12provide for integration with peers who do not have 13disabilities in bilingual classrooms. Annually, each January, 14school districts shall report data on students from 15non-English speaking backgrounds receiving special education 16and related services in public and private facilities as 17prescribed in Section 2-3.30. If there is a disagreement 18between parties involved regarding the special education 19placement of any child, either in-state or out-of-state, the 20placement is subject to impartial due process procedures 21described in Article 10 of the Rules and Regulations to Govern 22the Administration and Operation of Special Education.23    (e) No child who comes from a home in which a language 24other than English is the principal language used may be 25assigned to any class or program under this Article until he 26has been given, in the principal language used by the child and   HB4280- 11 -LRB104 16661 LNS 30065 b1used in his home, tests reasonably related to his cultural 2environment. All testing and evaluation materials and 3procedures utilized for evaluation and placement shall not be 4linguistically, racially or culturally discriminatory.5    (f) Nothing in this Article shall be construed to require 6any child to undergo any physical examination or medical 7treatment whose parents object thereto on the grounds that 8such examination or treatment conflicts with his religious 9beliefs.10    (g) School boards or their designee shall provide to the 11parents of a child or, if applicable, the Department of 12Children and Family Services' Office of Education and 13Transition Services prior written notice of any decision (a) 14proposing to initiate or change, or (b) refusing to initiate 15or change, the identification, evaluation, or educational 16placement of the child or the provision of a free appropriate 17public education to their child, and the reasons therefor. For 18a parent, such written notification shall also inform the 19parent of the opportunity to present complaints with respect 20to any matter relating to the educational placement of the 21student, or the provision of a free appropriate public 22education and to have an impartial due process hearing on the 23complaint. The notice shall inform the parents in the parents' 24native language, unless it is clearly not feasible to do so, of 25their rights and all procedures available pursuant to this Act 26and the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education   HB4280- 12 -LRB104 16661 LNS 30065 b1Improvement Act of 2004 (Public Law 108-446); it shall be the 2responsibility of the State Superintendent to develop uniform 3notices setting forth the procedures available under this Act 4and the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 5Improvement Act of 2004 (Public Law 108-446) to be used by all 6school boards. The notice shall also inform the parents of the 7availability upon request of a list of free or low-cost legal 8and other relevant services available locally to assist 9parents in initiating an impartial due process hearing. The 10State Superintendent shall revise the uniform notices required 11by this subsection (g) to reflect current law and procedures 12at least once every 2 years. The State Superintendent shall 13send a copy of the revised uniform notices by July 1 of every 14even-numbered year to each school district and statewide 15organization representing those school professions involved 16with individualized education programs, including, but not 17limited to, speech-language pathologists, school social 18workers, occupational therapists, and physical therapists. The 19copy of the revised uniform notices shall include an updated 20instruction guide and access to remote training materials.21     Any parent who is deaf or does not normally communicate 22using spoken English and who participates in a meeting with a 23representative of a local educational agency for the purposes 24of developing an individualized educational program or attends 25a multidisciplinary conference shall be entitled to the 26services of an interpreter. The State Board of Education must   HB4280- 13 -LRB104 16661 LNS 30065 b1adopt rules to establish the criteria, standards, and 2competencies for a bilingual language interpreter who attends 3an individualized education program meeting under this 4subsection to assist a parent who has limited English 5proficiency. 6    (g-5) For purposes of this subsection (g-5), "qualified 7professional" means an individual who holds credentials to 8evaluate the child in the domain or domains for which an 9evaluation is sought or an intern working under the direct 10supervision of a qualified professional, including a master's 11or doctoral degree candidate.12    To ensure that a parent can participate fully and 13effectively with school personnel in the development of 14appropriate educational and related services for his or her 15child, the parent, an independent educational evaluator, or a 16qualified professional retained by or on behalf of a parent or 17child must be afforded reasonable access to educational 18facilities, personnel, classrooms, and buildings and to the 19child as provided in this subsection (g-5). The requirements 20of this subsection (g-5) apply to any public school facility, 21building, or program and to any facility, building, or program 22supported in whole or in part by public funds. Prior to 23visiting a school, school building, or school facility, the 24parent, independent educational evaluator, or qualified 25professional may be required by the school district to inform 26the building principal or supervisor in writing of the   HB4280- 14 -LRB104 16661 LNS 30065 b1proposed visit, the purpose of the visit, and the approximate 2duration of the visit. The visitor and the school district 3shall arrange the visit or visits at times that are mutually 4agreeable. Visitors shall comply with school safety, security, 5and visitation policies at all times. School district 6visitation policies must not conflict with this subsection 7(g-5). Visitors shall be required to comply with the 8requirements of applicable privacy laws, including those laws 9protecting the confidentiality of education records such as 10the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act and the 11Illinois School Student Records Act. The visitor shall not 12disrupt the educational process.13        (1) A parent must be afforded reasonable access of 14    sufficient duration and scope for the purpose of observing 15    his or her child in the child's current educational 16    placement, services, or program or for the purpose of 17    visiting an educational placement or program proposed for 18    the child.19        (2) An independent educational evaluator or a 20    qualified professional retained by or on behalf of a 21    parent or child must be afforded reasonable access of 22    sufficient duration and scope for the purpose of 23    conducting an evaluation of the child, the child's 24    performance, the child's current educational program, 25    placement, services, or environment, or any educational 26    program, placement, services, or environment proposed for   HB4280- 15 -LRB104 16661 LNS 30065 b1    the child, including interviews of educational personnel, 2    child observations, assessments, tests or assessments of 3    the child's educational program, services, or placement or 4    of any proposed educational program, services, or 5    placement. If one or more interviews of school personnel 6    are part of the evaluation, the interviews must be 7    conducted at a mutually agreed-upon time, date, and place 8    that do not interfere with the school employee's school 9    duties. The school district may limit interviews to 10    personnel having information relevant to the child's 11    current educational services, program, or placement or to 12    a proposed educational service, program, or placement.13    (h) In the development of the individualized education 14program or federal Section 504 plan for a student, if the 15student needs extra accommodation during emergencies, 16including natural disasters or an active shooter situation, 17then that accommodation shall be taken into account when 18developing the student's individualized education program or 19federal Section 504 plan. 20    (i) A third-party software provider that creates a 21platform for an individualized educational assessment form 22shall include, on each page of the individualized educational 23assessment form, a footnote that includes a reference to how 24to contact the State Board of Education, instructions on 25completing an individualized educational assessment form, an 26instructional video on how to fill out an individualized   HB4280- 16 -LRB104 16661 LNS 30065 b1educational assessment form, and contact information for a 2person at the State Board of Education who can answer 3questions about completing an individualized educational 4assessment form.5    (j) A school district may not modify or customize its 6individualized educational assessment form.7    (k) The State Board of Education, in its adoption of rules 8regarding an individualized education program, may not include 9in an individualized educational assessment form a separate 10section regarding autism consideration. 11(Source: P.A. 103-197, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 12104-270, eff. 8-15-25; 104-368, eff. 1-1-26; revised 9-12-25.)